Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 3.2-4700.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Director”
means the Director of the Division of Marketing.

“Division”
means the Division of Marketing of the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-526; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-685; 1978, c. 396; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2A M.J., Auctions and Auctioneers, § 2.

§ 3.2-4701.
Division of Marketing; administration; appointment of Director and assistants; responsibilities.

The Division is hereby established within the Department, and shall be administered under the supervision of the Commissioner by the Director, who shall be qualified for the performance of his duties by training and experience.

The Division shall:

Promote the economical handling, packing, storage, distribution, and sale of agricultural products in the Commonwealth; and

Assist producers and consumers in selling and purchasing agricultural products at a fair and reasonable price.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-526; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-685; 1978, c. 396; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4702.
Powers and duties of Director.

In the administration of the Division, the Director, under the supervision of the Commissioner:

Shall investigate: (i) the cost of food production and marketing; (ii) the market demand for the products of Virginia farms; (iii) the proximity of producers to the most profitable markets for their products; (iv) the transportation facilities; and (v) the most advantageous methods of packing, storing, and standardizing agricultural products;

Shall conduct analyses to determine whether the agricultural products of the Commonwealth are being subjected to unfair competition from agricultural products or manufactured substitutes;

May assist in the organization of cooperatives among producers and consumers, for the purpose of promoting and conserving the interest of producers of agricultural products in the sale and distribution of such products, and in the purchase of their necessary supplies;

May cooperate with federal officials, national, district, and state committees and supervisory bodies in enforcing codes and marketing agreements adopted under the federal Agricultural Adjustment Act (7 U.S.C. § 1281 et seq.) or other similar acts of Congress;

May enter into agreements with federal officials, national, district, or state committees or supervisory bodies for carrying out the provisions of this section or the Federal Agricultural Adjustment Act or other similar acts of Congress;

May appoint, supervise, and dismiss as inspectors or representatives of the Division those employees of his office as he may deem necessary for the enforcement and carrying out the purposes of subdivisions 4 through 7; and

May receive from the federal department or its subdivisions, national, district or state committees or supervisory bodies, or from other sources, fees or moneys for carrying out the purposes of subdivisions 4 through 7, deposit them in the state treasury, and expend such moneys for carrying out the purposes of these subdivisions.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 3-527, 3-531; 1966, c. 702, §§ 3.1-686, 3.1-690; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4703.
Cooperation of U.S. Department of Agriculture.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the Division shall endeavor to secure the cooperation and assistance of the U.S. Department of Agriculture. It shall analyze: (i) the methods suggested by the U.S. Department of Agriculture for the promotion of economical and efficient marketing of agricultural products; and (ii) statistical information applicable to the marketing of Virginia agricultural products. When it is advisable and not inconsistent with the requirements of this chapter or of any other law of the Commonwealth, the Division shall endeavor to adopt any methods of marketing that may be suggested by the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-530; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-689; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4704.
Regulations.

The Board may adopt any marketing agreement approved by federal officials under the federal Agricultural Adjustment Act (7 U.S.C. § 1281 et seq.) and similar acts of Congress.

History.

1993, c. 115, § 3.1-690.1; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4705.
Division to disseminate information.

The Division of Marketing shall gather and disseminate information on all subjects relating to the marketing and distribution of Virginia agricultural products, and shall keep producers and consumers informed of the demand and supply and at what markets the various agricultural products can be best handled or procured. The Division shall: (i) publish periodical bulletins that provide the current market prices for Virginia agricultural products in the principal markets of the Commonwealth, and in other markets accessible for the disposition of such products; and (ii) when advisable, provide information as to the available supplies of agricultural products the demand in several markets for such products. The Division may also prepare and distribute bulletins describing the most efficient and economical methods of standardization, storage, packing, transportation, and marketing of agricultural products. The Division shall determine the sources of supply of agricultural products and prepare and publish lists of the names and addresses of producers and consignors and supply this information to interested persons.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-528; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-687; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4706.
Finding markets for producers.

When notified by producers that agricultural products produced in the Commonwealth cannot be sold or will have to be sacrificed for lack of a ready market, the Division shall investigate and make suggestions to the producers, and may assist the producers in any practicable manner in finding a satisfactory market for the products in question.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-529; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-688; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4707.
Investigation and correction of improper practices.

The Division shall investigate delays, improper conditions, overcharges, and unfair rates in the transportation of agricultural products, and may institute proceedings in the appropriate courts for the abatement or redress of such injuries; and may institute proper proceedings to prevent restraint of trade or unlawful combinations to fix prices.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-529; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-688; 1993, c. 115; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4708.
Penalty.

Any person violating any provision of this article, a regulation or marketing agreement adopted pursuant thereto, is guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

1993, c. 115, § 3.1-690.2; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.